Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6911
Late enrollee, defined.

Late enrollee means an eligible employee or dependent who requests enrollment in a health benefit plan following the initial enrollment period during which the individual is entitled to enroll under the terms of the health benefit plan if the initial enrollment period is a period of at least thirty days. An eligible employee or dependent shall not be considered a late enrollee if:

(1) The individual meets each of the following:

(a) The individual was covered under creditable coverage at the time of the initial enrollment;

(b) The individual lost coverage under creditable coverage as a result of termination of employment or eligibility, reduction in the number of hours of employment, the involuntary termination of the creditable coverage, death of a spouse, divorce, or legal separation; and

(c) The individual requests enrollment within thirty days after termination of the creditable coverage;

(2) The individual is employed by an employer which offers multiple health benefit plans and the individual elects a different plan during an open enrollment period;

(3) A court has ordered coverage be provided for a spouse or minor or dependent child under a covered employee's health benefit plan and request for enrollment is made within thirty days after issuance of the court order; or

(4) The individual had coverage under a COBRA continuation provision and the coverage under that provision was exhausted.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 11.